Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 2
FIREFIGHTERS' CIVIL SERVICE

31-30-201. Authorization - petition - election.

All cities or towns organized under the general laws of this state which have paid fire departments are authorized to adopt civil service regulations pertaining to such departments in the following manner:

The governing body may, and upon the petition of registered electors in number not less than fifteen percent of the last preceding vote for mayor shall, submit the question of accepting civil service provisions relative to such fire department to a vote of the registered electors at the next regular election. If a petition is submitted, the signatures to such petition shall be acknowledged before a notary public and need not be all on one paper. The ordinance or resolution calling for submission of the question shall provide for classification of all members of the fire department.

The election notice shall state that the question is submitted for the purpose of ascertaining whether or not the city or town will adopt civil service regulations relative to said fire department. The election shall be conducted as nearly as may be in accordance with the provisions of the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965". The ballots or voting machine tabs shall contain the words "For the Merit System" and "Against the Merit System".

If, upon the official determination of the result of such election, it appears that a majority of all the votes cast are for the adoption of the merit system under civil service regulations, this part 2 and all rules made under this part 2 shall immediately be in full force and effect in said city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1)(a) amended, p. 333, § 99, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-201 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Municipal Election Code of 1965", see article 10 of this title.

31-30-202. Commissioners appointed - terms - vacancies - expenses allowed.

Immediately upon the adoption of the merit system under civil service regulations, the governing body shall appoint three persons as civil service commissioners who shall be known and designated as the board of civil service commissioners or board of public safety to serve for six years, four years, and two years, respectively, from the date of their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Every alternate year the governing body shall appoint one person, as the successor of the commissioner whose term shall expire, to serve for the term of six years from the date of the appointment and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Any vacancy may be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governing body. At no time shall more than two commissioners be members of the same political party. Said commissioners shall serve without compensation but shall be paid their necessary expenses actually incurred in the discharge of their official duties.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-202 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-203. Merit.

Appointments and employment in and promotion to said fire department and said classified civil service shall be made according to merit and fitness, to be ascertained by competitive tests of competency except as provided in section 31-30-206.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-203 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-204. Removal - public hearings.

The classified civil service of the said city or town shall comprise all members of the fire department. Persons in the classified civil service shall hold their respective positions and be graded according to their competency, which shall be the same for all persons having like duty; except that the members of any paid fire department holding positions on the same at the time said city or town adopts the provisions of this part 2 shall retain their respective positions until removed after a public hearing for good cause shown, as provided in this section. They shall be removed or discharged only upon written charges which shall be filed by the head of the department or by any citizen of the city or town acting for the good of the service, to be promptly acted upon by the commission. All hearings before the commission shall be open to the public. No person shall be discharged for a political or religious reason. In case of emergency, the commission shall authorize the temporary appointment of members to the fire department without competitive tests for a period of not to exceed ninety days.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-204 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-205. Commission to make rules.

The making or enforcement of rules to carry out the purpose of the classified civil service of such city or town, the alteration and discharge of such rules, the conducting of all competitive tests and determination of all removals or discharge cases, and the standardization in such classified civil service shall be vested in the commission. No person in the classified civil service shall be paid until a certificate is made by the commission that his appointment is made pursuant to law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1215, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-205 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-206. Positions retained.

All persons holding regular positions in the classified civil service, as defined by this part 2, at the time of the adoption of the civil service provision, as provided in this part 2, shall retain their respective positions without examination or further appointment. In all other respects said persons shall be subject to the provisions and rules of this part 2.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1215, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-206 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-207. Commission to make inquiries - record - report.

It is the duty of the commission to investigate alleged breaches of this part 2 and its rules, and in the course of such investigations they, or any of them, may subpoena witnesses, administer oaths, and compel the testimony of witnesses and production of books, papers, and records relative to such inquiry, and it is the duty of such persons so subpoenaed to appear and testify and to produce such books, papers, and records as are called for in such subpoena. Should the person subpoenaed fail to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence, the commission may apply to the district court for an order compelling compliance with the subpoena. Failure to obey the order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court. The commission shall keep records of its proceedings and of all examinations held by it or under its authority. All records and documents filed by the commission shall be filed as public records. The minutes of the commission shall be kept in a separate book and shall be open to the public at all reasonable times.

The commission, on or before the December 1 preceding each regular session of the governing body, shall make a report to the governing body of its work during the preceding year and include therein all rules adopted and any suggestions for legislation to carry out the purposes of the civil service.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1215, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-207 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-208. Fee of applicants.

Every applicant for examination shall pay the commission a fee of one dollar for the purpose of defraying the expenses of conducting such examination. All moneys received or collected by the commission shall be paid into the municipal treasury and shall be placed by the treasurer in a separate fund to the credit of the commission for the use of said commission. No person shall be examined unless such fee has been paid.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1215, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-208 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-209. Powers of commission.

The commission has the power to make and enforce all rules and regulations, which rules and regulations shall be printed for distribution. No rule shall become effective until five days after publication of the same in some newspaper in said city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1216, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-209 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-210. Qualifications - notice of examination.

Applicants for appointment must be citizens of the United States and reside in the city and county of such municipality for one year next preceding the date of their application. All examinations must be impartial and only relate to the fitness of such persons examined for the service they wish to enter. Questions must not relate to political or religious affiliation, and an appointment must not be affected in any manner by political or religious affiliation. Notice of time, place, and scope of such examination must be given in the notice published in said paper. A person whose standing is less than sixty-five percent of complete proficiency may not be certified to appointment. Preference must be given to persons honorably discharged from the naval or military service of the United States and to discharged LGBT veterans, as defined in section 28-5-100.3, and whose qualifications are otherwise equal.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1216, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-026), ch. 42, p. 176, § 13, effective November 11.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-210 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Restoration of Honor Act") in SB 21-026, see section 1 of chapter 42, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.